Colorado statutes. TITLE 19 Children's Code
SUBPART B
PROGRAMS

19-2.5-1408. Victim-offender conferences - pilot program.

The division of youth services is authorized to establish a pilot program, when funds become available, in its facilities to facilitate victim-initiated victim-offender conferences whereby a victim of a crime may request a facilitated conference with
the juvenile who committed the crime, if the juvenile is in the custody of the division of youth services. After such a pilot program is established, the division of youth services may establish policies and procedures for the victim-offender
conferences using volunteers to facilitate the conferences. The volunteers shall complete the division of youth services' volunteer and facility-specific training programs and complete high-risk victim-offender training and victim-advocacy
training. The division of youth services shall not compensate or reimburse a volunteer or victim for any expenses. If a pilot program is available, and subsequent to the victim's or the victim representative's request, the division
of youth services shall arrange a conference only after determining that the conference would be safe and only if the juvenile agrees to participate. The purposes of the conference are to enable the victim to meet the juvenile, to
obtain answers to questions only the juvenile can answer, to assist the victim in healing from the impact of the crime, and to promote a sense of remorse and acceptance of responsibility by the juvenile that may contribute to the juvenile's
rehabilitation.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 682, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-311 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-1409. Juvenile intensive supervision program - creation - elements - role of judicial department.

The judicial department may establish and operate, either directly or by contracting with one or more private organizations, a juvenile intensive supervision program, which may be utilized by any judge in sentencing any juvenile who has been placed on
probation and who presents a high risk of future placement within juvenile correctional facilities according to assessment criteria developed pursuant to this section.

The juvenile intensive supervision program created pursuant to subsection (1) of this section must include, but is not limited to, utilization of any or all of the following elements:

Increased supervision of the juvenile by probation officers;

Utilization of specific youth case management approaches;

Community service work assignments;

Restitution programs;

Structured group training regarding problem solving, social skills, negotiation skills, emotion management, creative thinking, value enhancement, and critical reasoning;

Use of electronic or global position monitoring and substance abuse testing to monitor the juvenile's compliance with the program and providing sanctions for failure to comply with the program; and

Individual and family treatment.

The judicial department, with the assistance of a juvenile intensive supervision advisory committee, shall develop assessment criteria for placement in the juvenile intensive supervision program, including the results of a validated risk and needs assessment
tool, and judicial department guidelines for implementation of the program and measurement of the outcome of the program. The advisory committee is appointed by the state court administrator and includes, but is not limited to,
representatives of the division of youth services in the department of human services and the division of criminal justice of the department of public safety.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 682, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former §§ 19-2-306 and 19-2-307 as they existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-1410. Community accountability program - legislative declaration - creation.

It is the intent of the general assembly that the program established pursuant to this section benefit the state by providing a structured program combining residential and community reintegration components under which certain adjudicated juveniles are
subject to an ordered environment affirming the dignity of self and others; promoting the value of education, work, and accountability; adhering to the principals of restorative justice; and developing useful skills that can be
applied when the juvenile is reintegrated into the community.

The division of youth services, pursuant to a contract with one or more private entities, shall establish, maintain, and operate a community accountability program, referred to in this section as the "program".

The program must provide a sentencing option for adjudicated juveniles who are at least fourteen years of age but younger than eighteen years of age. An adjudicated juvenile may be sentenced to participate in the program only as a condition of probation.
A sentence to the program may be in addition to, but must not be in lieu of, a mandatory sentence required by section 19-2.5-1123. The juvenile court shall consider the program as a sentencing option for higher risk juveniles
who would have otherwise been sentenced to detention or out-of-home placement or committed to the department of human services.

A sentence imposed pursuant to this section is conditioned on the availability of space in the program and the division of youth services' determination of whether the juvenile's participation in the program is appropriate. A juvenile may be denied participation
in the program upon a determination by the division of youth services that a physical or mental health condition, including severe substance abuse, will prevent the juvenile's full participation in the program. Any juvenile
denied participation in the program must be returned to the juvenile court for resentencing.

The judicial department shall provide information to the division of youth services concerning the juvenile's sentencing, including but not limited to the juvenile's criminal history, the presentence investigation report, the risk-need assessment, and
demographics pertaining to the juvenile.

The program must be established for up to eighty beds. Pursuant to the contract entered into pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section, the division of youth services shall pay only for the actual number of juveniles placed in the program.

If feasible, the program may be established regionally, one in each of the division of youth services' regions. The division of youth services, through a competitive bid process, shall select one or more private entities to operate the program.

The program consists of two integrated components. Each selected entity shall provide both components within the contracted region as follows:

Component I. Component I consists of a sixty-day residential program, which may contain, but need not be limited to, the following program elements:

Assessment and treatment planning;

Behaviorally based programming with appropriate sanctions and reinforcements;

Life and cognitive skill development;

Treatment interventions;

Educational and vocational training;

Competency development;

Victim awareness and empathy;

Gender-specific programming; and

Restorative justice programming.

Component II. The division of youth services shall administer component II, which consists of a community reintegration phase. For each juvenile entering component II, the division of youth services and the local probation department shall jointly establish
a reintegration plan. Component II may contain, but need not be limited to, the following program elements:

Multi-systemic therapy;

Functional family therapy;

Aggression replacement training;

Life skills;

Skills development;

Behaviorally based programming with appropriate sanctions and reinforcements;

Education and vocational training;

Work experience;

Victim empathy;

Victim-offender mediation;

Gender-specific programming; and

Restorative justice programming.

The program may be housed in a privately owned and operated facility or in a state-owned and privately operated facility. The state department of human services and any private contractors in each region shall involve local governments in identifying
locations for residential facilities.

The division of youth services shall include a community involvement component in the development of reintegration plans, which may include the creation of community advisory boards.

If a juvenile in the first component of the program would substantially benefit, the division of youth services shall notify the local department of probation who may petition the court for an extension of up to fifteen days in addition to the initial
sixty-day period for the first component of the program. The period of time a juvenile spends in the second component of the program must not exceed one hundred twenty days. The entire period of a juvenile's participation in the
program must not exceed the length of the juvenile's probation sentence. Whenever a juvenile fails to progress through or complete the first or second component of the program, the juvenile is subject to section 19-2.5-1108 (8)
for violating a condition of probation.

The division of youth services and the judicial department shall jointly establish guidelines for the program and for each of the components described in subsection (4) of this section. The division of youth services shall make available necessary support
services for the juvenile and the juvenile's family under both components of the program.

The division of youth services shall conduct an ongoing evaluation of the program. On or before January 15 each year, the division of youth services shall submit a report of the evaluation results to the general assembly. Notwithstanding section 24-1-136
(11)(a)(I), the reporting requirements in this subsection (7) continue indefinitely. The division of youth services may contract for the services and labor necessary to perform the ongoing evaluation.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 683, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-309.5 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-1411. Parental responsibility training programs - criteria.

The state department of human services, after consultation with the state department of public safety and the judicial department, shall establish standards and guidelines for parental responsibility training programs for the parent, guardian, or legal
custodian of a juvenile or juvenile delinquent. The standards and guidelines must include, but are not limited to, instruction in the following:

Physical, mental, social, and emotional child growth and development;

Skill development for parents in providing for the juvenile's learning and development, including teaching the juvenile responsibility for the juvenile's actions;

Prevention of substance abuse;

Family structure, function, and management; and

The physical, mental, emotional, social, economic, and psychological aspects of interpersonal and family relationships.

The state department of human services is authorized and directed to establish such standards and guidelines within the available resources of the state government and each of the state departments described in subsection (1) of this section.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 686, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-304 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-1412. Youth corrections monetary incentives award program - designated monetary custodian.

The division of youth services in the department of human services is authorized to establish, at its discretion, a youth corrections monetary incentives award program, referred to in this section as the "program". The purpose of the program is to provide
monetary awards and incentives for academic, social, and psychological achievement to juveniles who were formerly committed to the division of youth services who are on parole, in community corrections, or now off of parole.

If the division of youth services establishes a program, it shall devise, in collaboration with the nonprofit organization designated pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, appropriate participation criteria, application procedures, any necessary
organizational structure, and criteria for awarding individual scholarships. Criteria may, but are not required to, include that the juvenile:

Maintains the highest grades possible each academic term;

Makes consistent progress in the juvenile's therapy or other assigned program, if applicable, during each academic term, as determined by the team of professionals who worked with the juvenile while committed to the division of youth services; and

Uses the money earned only for expenses approved as necessary and valid by the division of youth services and the nonprofit organization designated pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.

If the division of youth services establishes a program, it shall, in conjunction with the director of the legislative council, use a request for proposal process to contract with and designate a nonprofit organization, referred to in this section as
the "designated nonprofit", to serve as the custodian of money donated to the program through the designated nonprofit. The designated nonprofit shall work with the division of youth services for the purpose of designing the program
criteria, accepting funds for program scholarships, and providing a distribution mechanism for such scholarships.

The designated nonprofit and the division of youth services are authorized to solicit, accept, and expend monetary and in-kind gifts, grants, and donations on behalf of the program and for payment of scholarships to juveniles in the program. Any money
donated or awarded to the designated nonprofit for the benefit of the program is not subject to appropriation by the general assembly. The designated nonprofit is not the custodian of any money appropriated by the state,
which must be annually appropriated by the general assembly to the division of youth services in the department of human services. Any money obtained by the division of youth services or the designated nonprofit that is
unexpended and unencumbered at such time the program is dissolved must be distributed according to appropriate federal and state laws governing nonprofit organizations.

If a different nonprofit or private organization is subsequently designated as the custodian of donated money in accordance with this subsection (4), the former designated nonprofit shall promptly transfer to the newly designated nonprofit or private
organization any money that is unexpended and unencumbered at the time of the change in designation.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 686, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-312 as it existed prior to 2021.